New Mexico, session 2026, SB74.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 30-18-9 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1981, Chapter 30, Section 1, as amended) is amended to read: "30-18-9. DOG FIGHTING AND COCKFIGHTING--PENALTY.-- A. It is unlawful for any person to cause, sponsor, arrange, hold or participate in a fight between dogs or cocks for the purpose of monetary gain or entertainment. Participation in a fight between dogs or cocks for the purpose of monetary gain or entertainment consists of an adult knowingly: (1) being present at a dog fight or cockfight without attempting to interfere with or stop the contest; or (2) owning or equipping one of the participating dogs or cocks with knowledge of the contest. B. It is unlawful to train, equip or sponsor a dog or cock for the purpose of having it participate in a fight with another dog or cock, respectively, for monetary gain or entertainment. C. Any person violating the provisions of Subsection A or B of this section [as it pertains to dogs] is guilty of a fourth degree felony. [D. Any person violating the provisions of Subsection A or B of this section as it pertains to cocks: (1) upon a first conviction, is guilty of a petty misdemeanor; (2) upon a second conviction, is guilty of a misdemeanor; and (3) upon a third or subsequent conviction, is guilty of a fourth degree felony.]" - 2 -